Utah statutes.
59-14-207.6.   Unstamped cigarettes.
(1)  A person who ships unstamped cigarette packages into the state, other
than to a licensed manufacturer, importer, distributor, or retailer who is
authorized to affix stamps, shall first file with the commission a notice of
shipment.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to a common or contract carrier that is
transporting cigarettes through this state to another location under a proper
bill of lading or freight bill, which states the quantity, source, and
destination of the cigarettes.
